Massachusetts, session 194th, S1401.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 123 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 12, the word “and”.
SECTION 2. Said section 2 of said chapter 123, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “facilities”, in lines 13 to 14, the following words:- , and (4)
shall be developed in a manner consistent with available physician resources and in accordance
with national standards for providing evening and night coverage for hospitals.
SECTION 3. Section 5 of said chapter 123, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the fourth sentence the following sentence:- Such independent medical
examination, if requested by the indigent person or his counsel, shall be requested not more than
of 3

24 hours after the appointment of counsel and shall be completed within 3 business days after
such request for the independent medical examination.
SECTION 4. Said section 5 of said chapter 123, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 15, the words “unless counsel requests a delay”.
SECTION 5. Section 7 of said chapter 123, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in lines 24 and 25, the words “, unless a delay is requested by the person or his
counsel”.
SECTION 6. Said section 7 of said chapter 123, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in lines 26 to 27, the words “, unless a delay is requested by the person
or his counsel”.
SECTION 7. Section 8B of said chapter 123, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 21, the figure “fourteen” and inserting in place thereof the figure:- “5”.
SECTION 8. Subsection (d) of section 5-308 of chapter 190B of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “as
expeditiously as possible”, in line 55, the following words:- ; provided however, for patients in
inpatient mental health facilities, said hearing shall be conducted within 7 days of the filing of
the petition and the notice required under subsection (c) of this section shall be adjusted
accordingly.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any general or special law, regulation or procedure to the
contrary, the department of children and families, in conjunction with the office of the child
advocate, shall develop a facilitated process and time frame for the administration of
of 3

antipsychotic medication for children in their custody who are hospitalized in inpatient
psychiatric facilities.
of 3